Maine, session 132, LD1493.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §13090-L, sub-§2-A, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2009, c. 470, §1, is
amended by amending subparagraph (5) to read:
(5) A finished production that solicits funds; or
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §13090-L, sub-§2-A, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2009, c. 470, §1, is
amended by amending subparagraph (6) to read:
(6) A production for which records are required to be maintained by 18 United
States Code, Section 2257.;
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §13090-L, sub-§2-A, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2009, c. 470, §1, is
amended by enacting a new subparagraph (7) to read:
(7) A commercial or promotional production intended to advance a product or
service to the benefit of an individual or organization; or
Sec. 4. 5 MRSA §13090-L, sub-§2-A, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2009, c. 470, §1, is
amended by enacting a new subparagraph (8) to read:
(8) A production produced primarily for industrial, corporate or institutional
purposes or for internal use.
Page 1 - 132LR1865(03)